Utah statutes.
9-8-307.   Report of discovery on state or private lands.

(1)  Any person who discovers any archaeological resources on lands owned or controlled by the state or its subdivisions shall promptly report the discovery to the division.

(2)  Any person who discovers any archaeological resources on privately owned lands shall promptly report the discovery to the division.

(3)  Field investigations shall be discouraged except in accordance with this part and Part 4.

(4)  Nothing in this section may be construed to authorize any person to survey or excavate for archaeological resources.



Amended by Chapter 170, 1995 General Session

